Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0368

Sports wagering over the internet authorized.

The transmission of gambling information over the internet for any sports wagering conducted and operated under this section and RCW 9.46.0364 is authorized, provided that the wager may be placed and accepted at a tribe's gaming facility only while the customer placing the wager is physically present on the premises of that tribe's gaming facility.

[ 2020 c 127 s 9.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2020 c 127: See notes following RCW 9.46.0364.